Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-208
Filing duty of Secretary of State.

(MBCA 1.25) (a) If a document
delivered to the office of the Secretary of State for filing satisfies the
requirements of section 21-203, the Secretary of State shall file it.

(b) The Secretary of State
files a document by recording it as filed on the date and at the time of receipt.
After filing a document, except as provided in sections 21-235 and 21-2,211,
the Secretary of State shall deliver to the domestic or foreign corporation
or its representative a copy of the document with an acknowledgment of the
date and time of filing.

(c)
If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document, it shall be returned
to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within five days
after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation
of the reason for refusal.

(d)
The Secretary of State's duty to file documents under this section is ministerial.
The Secretary of State's filing or refusing to file a document does not:

(1) Affect the validity
or invalidity of the document in whole or part;

(2) Relate to the correctness or incorrectness
of information contained in the document; or

(3) Create a presumption that the document
is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct
or incorrect.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 8.